Florida, session 2026, SB1526.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSection 395.3045, Florida Statutes, is created 13 to read: 14 395.3045âOffice surgery suites; safety design standards.â 15 (1)âBy October 1, 2026, the Florida Building Commission 16 shall establish within the Florida Building Code, and the State 17 Fire Marshal shall establish within the Florida Fire Prevention 18 Code, safety design standards that allow office surgery suites 19 to provide the following services or treatments simultaneously 20 for up to six patients on an outpatient basis: 21 (a)âTreatment for patients which renders the patients 22 incapable of taking action for self-preservation under emergency 23 conditions without the assistance of others. 24 (b)âAnesthesia that renders the patients incapable of 25 taking action for self-preservation under emergency conditions 26 without the assistance of others. 27 (c)âTreatment for patients who, due to the nature of their 28 injury or illness, are incapable of taking action for self 29 preservation under emergency conditions without the assistance 30 of others. 31 (2)âThe safety design standards established under 32 subsection (1) must be an alternative to the safety design 33 standards for ambulatory health care occupancies. For purposes 34 of this subsection, the term âoffice surgery suiteâ means that 35 portion of a physicianâs office where surgery is performed. 36 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.